Tennessee, session 114, SB1135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 29-3-106(a)(1), is amended by
deleting "Five (5) days'" and substituting "Four (4) days'".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 29-3-106(c), is amended by deleting
"five (5) days" and substituting "four (4) days".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1135
003189
- 1 -